Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 28.2-1100.
Virginia Institute of Marine Science continued; duties.

The Virginia Institute of Marine Science shall hereafter be referred to as the Institute. The Institute shall:

Conduct studies and investigations of the seafood and commercial fishing and sport fishing industries;

Consider ways to conserve, develop and replenish fisheries resources and advise the Marine Resources Commission and other agencies and private groups on these matters;

Conduct studies of problems pertaining to the other segments of the maritime economy;

Conduct studies of marine pollution in cooperation with the State Water Control Board and the Department of Health and make the data and their recommendations available to the appropriate agencies;

Conduct hydrographic and biological studies of the Chesapeake Bay, its tributaries, and all the tidal waters of the Commonwealth and the contiguous waters of the Atlantic Ocean;

Engage in research in the marine sciences;

Conduct such special studies and investigations concerning these subjects as requested by the Governor;

Engage in research and provide training, technical assistance and advice to the Board of Conservation and Recreation on erosion along tidal shorelines, the Soil and Water Conservation Board on matters relating to tidal shoreline erosion, and to other agencies upon request; and

Develop comprehensive coastal resource management guidance for local governments to foster the sustainability of shoreline resources by December 30, 2012. The guidance shall identify preferred options for shoreline management and taking into consideration the resource condition, priority planning, and forecasting of the condition of the Commonwealth’s shoreline with respect to projected sea-level rise.These studies shall include consideration of the seafood and other marine resources, such as the waters, bottoms, shorelines, tidal wetlands, and beaches, and all matters related to marine waters and the means by which marine resources might be conserved, developed and replenished.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-248, 28-250, 28-250.1; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-195; 1979, c. 294; 1980, c. 369; 1992, c. 836; 2003, cc. 79, 89; 2011, c. 885.

Cross references.

For provisions subjecting the Virginia Institute of Marine Science to the control of the board of visitors of the The College of William and Mary in Virginia, see §

23.1-2807

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 79 and 89 are identical, and substituted “Board of Conservation and Recreation” for “Board on Conservation and Development of Public Beaches” in subdivision 8.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 885, added subdivision 9, and in the last paragraph substituted “shorelines” for “shore lines.”

§ 28.2-1101.
Use of services of other agencies; solicitation, etc., of funds; taking fish and other marine organisms.

In conducting its studies and investigations under §

28.2-1100

, the Institute may:

Use the services of any public or private agency;

With the prior written approval of the Governor and subject to other provisions of law, solicit, accept and use funds available from any public or private source; and

Cooperate with appropriate state agencies and with similar agencies and institutions in other states and the federal government.

The Institute, its officers, agents, and employees, or persons operating under its direction may take for scientific purposes, any fish, shellfish or marine organism from the waters of Virginia, and with the consent of the Commission, may sell such fish, shellfish or marine organisms or parts thereof as may not be necessary for such scientific purposes.

History.

1962, c. 406, § 28.1-196; 1968, c. 237; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-1102.
Destroying, etc., property of Institute a misdemeanor.

It shall be unlawful and constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor for anyone without authority to destroy, remove, damage, or molest any property of the Institute.

History.

1962, c. 406, § 28.1-200; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.